Missouri, session 2026, HB2785.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 217.425, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 217.425, to read as follows:
217.425. 1. (1) The director may extend the limits of the place of confinement of an
offender who, he has reasonable cause to believe, will honor his trust, by authorizing the
offender, under prescribed conditions, to visit specifically designated places within the state
for a period not to exceed thirty days per year and to return to the custody of the department.
The authority herein conferred may be exercised to permit the offender to visit a relative who
is ill, to attend the funeral of a relative, to obtain medical services not otherwise available, to
contact prospective employers and to participate in approved rehabilitation programs. If the
offender is enrolled in a community release program or in need of emergency medical
services, the thirty day per annum limitation may be extended at the director's discretion.
(2) If an offender does not obtain a furlough by the director under subdivision
(1) of this subsection to attend a funeral of a relative, the offender has the right to attend
the funeral if:
(a) The relative is an immediate family member of the offender. As used in this
paragraph, "immediate family member" means a spouse, child, sibling, parent,
grandparent, grandchild, stepparent, stepchild, stepsibling, or an adoptive relationship;
(b) The offender is escorted to the funeral by department of corrections staff;
and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2785 2
(c) The offender pays for any costs associated with attending the funeral,
including escort costs under paragraph (b) of this subdivision. Such costs shall be paid
by the offender to the department prior to the funeral.
2. A copy of any order of the director shall be sent to the circuit judge, sheriff and
prosecuting attorney of the county or circuit attorney of any city not within a county from
which the offender was sentenced and the county of the proposed visit at least ten days in
advance of such order except in the case of an order permitting the visit to attend the funeral
of a relative or for an emergency medical furlough.
✔